Washington statutes.
RCW 43.44.030

Schools—Compliance with standards for fire prevention and safety—Plan reviews and construction inspections.

The director of fire protection shall make or cause to be made plan reviews and construction inspections for all E-1 occupancies as may be necessary to insure compliance with the state building code and standards for schools adopted under chapter 19.27 RCW. Nothing in this section prohibits the director of fire protection from delegating construction inspection authority to any local jurisdiction.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 49; 1991 c 170 s 2; 1986 c 266 s 69; 1985 c 470 s 19; 1981 c 198 s 3; 1972 ex.s. c 70 s 1. Formerly RCW 48.48.045.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.

Severability—Effective date—1985 c 470: See notes following RCW 43.44.010.